not-to-release/morphology/savestack.foma
# Transliteration from romanized lexical symbols to the Perso-Arabic Uyghur script.
# Arrows do not guarantee 1-1 mapping. The up transition will assume that Arabic letters can also occur in the lexicon. It will thus produce all possible partial transliterations, i.e. combinations of Latin and Arabic letters. Therefore we also define the opposite transliteration in a separate expression.
define TranslitL2U '->ئ, a->ا, b->ب, č->چ, d->د, e->ە, ë->ې, f->ف, g->گ, ğ->غ, h->ھ, i->ى, j->ج, k->ك, l->ل, m->م, n->ن, ŋ->ڭ, o->و, ö->ۆ, p->پ, q->ق, r->ر, s->س, š->ش, t->ت, u->ۇ, ü->ۈ, w->ۋ, x->خ, y->ي, z->ز ;
define TranslitU2L ئ->', ا->a, ب->b, چ->č, د->d, ە->e, ې->ë, ف->f, گ->g, غ->ğ, ھ->h, ى->i, ج->j, ك->k, ل->l, م->m, ن->n, ڭ->ŋ, و->o, ۆ->ö, پ->p, ق->q, ر->r, س->s, ش->š, ت->t, ۇ->u, ۈ->ü, ۋ->w, خ->x, ي->y, ز->z ;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ;

read lexc ug.lexc
define Lexicon ;

# Uncomment this if you want to prepare the binary file for fslookup (and then analyze real-world text).
regex Lexicon .o. Cleanup .o. TranslitL2U ;
save stack ug.bin
exit
